Idaho, session 2025, H0388.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 26, Title 63, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 26
COUNTY PROPERTY TAX RELIEF
63-2601. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "County Property Tax Relief Act."
63-2602. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The legislature finds that the in-
creased influx of people traveling to counties for conventions, higher
education, recreation, sporting events, and tourism has created a drain
on county services that is borne by residential property owners to an in-
equitable degree. In addition, the close proximity of a large population
center to a county has the additional effect of requiring the county to
service the needs of persons traveling to the county on a short-term basis,
an effect that is also met by residential property owners of a county to an
inequitable degree. The legislature finds that it is equitable to shift
this tax burden in part from residential property owners in a county to the
visitors utilizing county services. The legislature also finds that this
objective must be subject to the approval and supervision of the voters of
the county both through their elected county commissioners and through di-
rect input at the ballot box.
63-2603. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter, unless the context re-
quires otherwise:


(1) "Campground" means any privately owned business that rents areas or
places used for camping or parking campers, travel trailers, motorhomes, or
tents.
(2) "County property tax relief fund" means the fund created by a county
that assesses a county transient room tax that is dedicated to the reduction
of county property tax budgets.
(3) "County transient room tax" means a tax levied by the county on a
sale by a hotel, motel, short-term rental, vacation rental, or campground.
(4) "Hotel" or "motel" means an establishment that provides lodging to
members of the public for a fee and includes condominiums, townhouses, or any
other establishment that makes a sale as defined in this section.
(5) "Sale" means the renting of a place to sleep to an individual by a
hotel, motel, short-term rental, vacation rental, or campground for a pe-
riod of less than thirty-one (31) continuous days. "Sale" shall not include
the renting of a place to sleep to an individual by the Idaho Ronald McDonald
House.
(6) "Short-term rental" or "vacation rental" means any individually or
collectively owned single-family house or dwelling unit; any unit or group
of units in a condominium, cooperative, or timeshare; or an owner-occupied
residential home that is offered for rent for a fee for thirty (30) days or
less.
63-2604. AUTHORITY FOR COUNTY RESIDENTS TO APPROVE AND THE BOARD OF
COUNTY COMMISSIONERS TO ADOPT, IMPLEMENT, AND COLLECT COUNTY TRANSIENT ROOM
TAX. The qualified electors of any county within the state of Idaho shall
hereby have the authority to authorize the board of county commissioners of
their county to adopt, implement, and collect a county transient room tax
not to exceed three percent (3%) of the sales price of any sale within such
county. The board of county commissioners of any county shall hereby have
the authority to adopt, implement, and collect a county transient room tax
as provided in this chapter, if approved by a majority of all votes cast by
the qualified electors of the county voting in an election conducted on the
first Tuesday following the first Monday in November. No county transient
room tax may be presented to county voters for approval or modification for a
period of eleven (11) months after an election to approve or disapprove such
tax. The question presented to the voters of a county shall state the rate of
the county transient room tax, the duration of the tax, and the purpose of the
tax.
63-2605. GENERAL PROVISIONS. Prior to collecting the tax authorized
under this chapter, the board of county commissioners shall adopt an ordi-
nance that:
(1) States and defines the specific tax to be assessed;
(2) States the exact purpose or purposes for which revenues derived
from the tax will be used;
(3) States and defines the percentage of the tax to be used for property
tax relief, provided that such amount shall not be less than fifty percent
(50%) of the annual revenue from the tax; and
(4) States the duration of the tax.


63-2606. AUTHORIZED USES. The board of county commissioners may only
use the tax revenue collected pursuant to this chapter for the following pur-
poses:
(1) To pay for property tax relief for the homeowners of the county as
provided in this chapter;
(2) To pay for the following public safety services provided by the
county:
(a) Law enforcement services;
(b) Search and rescue services;
(c) Emergency medical services; and
(d) Fire protection services; and
(3) To pay ambulance service districts and fire protection districts
in the county if such districts provide emergency medical or fire protection
services in the county. Such districts shall be entitled to an apportionment
of the tax revenue as provided in this subsection.
(a) The county auditor shall quarterly apportion and distribute no more
than fifty percent (50%) of tax collections to the county and to each am-
bulance service district and fire protection district in the county.
(b) Funds shall be apportioned to the county and each ambulance service
district and fire protection district in the county based on the propor-
tion each such district's current nonexempt property tax budget bears
to the sum of the current nonexempt property tax budgets of the county
and all such ambulance service districts and fire protection districts
in the county. Each year, starting with the distribution for the quar-
ter ending December 31, the county auditor shall calculate the distri-
bution pursuant to this subsection based on the county's and each dis-
trict's current nonexempt property tax budgets. When an ambulance ser-
vice district or fire protection district is situated in more than one
(1) county, only the portion attributable to the ambulance service dis-
trict or fire protection district from each county in which it is situ-
ated shall be used in the apportionment of the tax revenue.
(c) If ambulance service districts or fire protection districts are
consolidated, the resulting district is entitled to an amount equal
to the sum of the amounts received in the last calendar quarter by each
district prior to the consolidation.
(d) If an ambulance service district or fire protection district is
dissolved or disincorporated after the apportionment of funds has been
determined pursuant to this subsection, the county auditor shall dis-
tribute such district's portion of funds to the county until the next
calendar year, at which time the funds shall be reapportioned as pro-
vided for in this subsection.
(e) A county, ambulance service district, or fire district shall use
funds received under the provisions of this chapter only for the pur-
poses provided for in this section.
63-2607. COUNTY PROPERTY TAX RELIEF FUND. (1) Any county assessing a
tax pursuant to this chapter shall create and establish in the office of the
county treasurer a county property tax relief fund into which shall be placed
a minimum of fifty percent (50%) of any revenues received from the county
transient room tax.


(2) On or before the second Monday in September of each year, the county
treasurer shall submit to the board of county commissioners a statement
showing the balance in the county property tax relief fund as of September
1 of that year. The balance of the moneys reflected in such statement shall
be used to reduce the amount of the property tax portion of the county's bud-
get for that year. For the purposes of the budget limitations provided in
section 63-802, Idaho Code, the amount of such revenues that are applied to
reduce the county's property tax portion of its budget shall not reduce the
amount that a county may increase the property tax portion of its budget and
shall be deemed to be included in the amount of property tax revenue certi-
fied by the county pursuant to section 63-803, Idaho Code.
(3) The moneys applied to reduce the property tax portion of the
county's budget shall be designated as a line item credit against the total
of county property taxes on the property tax bill for each property owner
paying county property taxes in the year such moneys were applied.
(4) By no later than December 20 of each year, the county treasurer
shall transfer an amount equal to the balance in the county property tax
relief fund as of September 1 of that year to the county current expense fund
for the reduction in the property tax portion of the budget as provided in
this section.
63-2608. COLLECTION AND ADMINISTRATION OF COUNTY TRANSIENT ROOM TAX
BY STATE TAX COMMISSION -- DISTRIBUTION. (1) Any county that has levied a tax
pursuant to this chapter may contract with the state tax commission for the
collection and administration of such taxes in like manner and under the def-
initions, rules, and regulations of the state tax commission for the collec-
tion and administration of the state sales tax under chapter 36, title 63,
Idaho Code. A county that levies such tax shall have the right to review and
audit the records of collection thereof maintained by the commission and the
returns of taxpayers relating to such tax. Alternatively, such county shall
have authority to administer and collect such tax on its own.
(2) All revenues collected by the state tax commission pursuant to this
chapter shall be distributed as follows:
(a) An amount shall be distributed to the state refund account suffi-
cient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized by the state
tax commission to be paid shall be paid through the state refund account
and those moneys are continuously appropriated;
(b) An amount shall be distributed to the state tax commission equal
to the fee as may be agreed on between the state tax commission and the
county for the actual cost of the collection and administration of the
tax. The amount retained by the state tax commission shall not exceed
the amount authorized to be expended by appropriation by the legisla-
ture; and
(c) All remaining moneys received pursuant to this chapter shall be
placed in an account designated by the state controller and remitted
monthly to the county levying such tax.
SECTION 2. That Section 63-1804, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


63-1804. LIMITING TAX DUTIES OF SHORT-TERM RENTAL MARKETPLACES --
COLLECTION OF TAX. (1) A local government may not levy a sales, use, fran-
chise, receipts, or other similar tax or fee on the business of operating a
short-term rental marketplace.
(2) A short-term rental marketplace shall register with the state
tax commission for collection, reporting, and payment of sales and use and
travel and convention taxes levied by this state and any applicable local
government taxes administered by the state tax commission on short-term
rentals and vacation rentals due from a lodging operator on any lodging
transaction facilitated by the short-term rental marketplace.
(3) A short-term rental marketplace shall collect, report, and pay
taxes imposed on the lodging operator or occupant of a short-term rental or
vacation rental by any local government.
(4) Any local government that has levied a tax pursuant to statutory au-
thorization, may contract with the state tax commission for the collection
and administration of such taxes in like manner and under definitions and
rules of the state tax commission for the collection and administration of
the state sales or use tax under chapter 36, title 63, Idaho Code. Alterna-
tively, such local government shall have authority to administer and collect
such tax. All revenues collected on behalf of the local governments by the
state tax commission pursuant to this chapter shall be distributed as fol-
lows: An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund fund suffi-
cient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized by the commission
to be paid shall be paid through the state refund fund and those moneys are
continuously appropriated. The state tax commission may retain an amount of
money equal to such fee as may be agreed upon on between the state tax com-
mission and such local government for the actual cost of the collection and
administration of the tax. The amount retained by the commission shall not
exceed the amount authorized to be expended by appropriation by the legis-
lature. Any unencumbered balance in excess of the actual cost at the end of
each fiscal year shall be distributed as provided in this section. All re-
maining moneys received pursuant to this chapter shall be placed in a fund
designated by the state controller and remitted monthly to the local govern-
ment levying such tax.
(5) If the owner of a short-term rental offers a short-term rental or
vacation rental directly to an occupant without the use of a short-term
rental marketplace, such owner shall comply with all of the requirements of
this section.
(5) (6) A short-term rental marketplace or owner of a short-term rental
that has not facilitated a lodging transaction in Idaho shall have forty-
five (45) days to comply with this section upon completion of their such mar-
ketplace's or owner's first lodging transaction in Idaho.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.